nb: Kunst og underholdning > Hobby og kreativitet > Kunst og håndverk > Verktøy til kunst og håndverk > Verktøy for hobbykutting og preging: Hobby- og kontorsakser; Hobbykuttere og pregere; Hobbykniver; Hobbybrennverktøy; Varmepregeverktøy; Pregepenner og -styluser; Sprettekniver; Tråd- og garnkuttere
ru: Искусство и развлечения > Хобби и творчество > Искусство и рукоделие > Инструменты для художественных работ и рукоделия > Режущие инструменты и инструменты для эмбоссинга: Канцелярские ножницы и ножницы для рукоделия; Машинки для вырубки и тиснения; Макетные ножи; Инструменты для биговки; Фены для эмбоссинга; Ручки и стилусы для эмбоссинга; Вспарыватели; Инструменты для обрезки ниток и пряжи
da: Kunst og underholdning > Hobby og håndarbejde > Håndarbejde og hobby > Værktøjer til håndarbejde og hobby > Skære- og prægningsværktøjer til håndarbejde: Skrædder- og papirsakse; Skæremaskiner og maskiner til prægning; Håndarbejdsknive; Papirskærere; Varmeværktøjer til prægning; Prægning – penne; Opsprættere; Tråd og garn – sakse
sv: Konst och underhållning > Hobby och skapande > Hantverk och hobbyer > Hobbyverktyg > Verktyg för hobbyskärning och relieftryck: Hobby- och kontorssaxar; Hobbyskärare och reliefstämplar; Skärknivar; Pappersveckare; Verktyg för relieftryck; Relieftryckpennor; Sprättare; Tråd- och garnskärare
lt-LT: Menai ir pramogos > Hobiai ir menai > Menai ir amatai > Menų ir amatų įrankiai > Pjovimo ir įspaudimo įrankiai rankdarbiams: Rankdarbių ir biuro žirklės; Rankdarbių pjovikliai ir įspaudimo įrankiai; Rankdarbių peiliai; Raižymo įrankiai rankdarbiams; Šiluminiai įspaudimo įrankiai; Įspaudimo rašikliai ir plunksnos; Siūlių ardymo įrankiai; Siūlų ir verpalų pjovikliai
fr: Arts et loisirs > Loisirs et arts créatifs > Loisirs créatifs > Outils pour loisirs créatifs > Outils de découpage et de gaufrage pour loisirs créatifs: Ciseaux de bureau et ciseaux pour loisirs créatifs; Machines à couper et à gaufrer pour loisirs créatifs; Couteaux de précision; Outils d’entaille pour loisirs créatifs; Outils de gaufrage thermique; Stylos et stylets à gaufrage; Découseurs; Coupe-fils
nl: Kunst en entertainment > Hobby's en creatieve vaardigheden > Handwerk en hobby's > Handwerk- en hobbygereedschap > Gereedschap voor snij- en reliëfwerk: Hobby- en kantoorscharen; Handwerkmessen en -reliëfpennen; Stanleymessen; Hulpmiddelen voor het vouwen van papier; Warmtegereedschap voor reliëfs; Reliëfpennen; Tornmesjes; Draad- en garenscharen
pt-PT: Artes e lazer > Passatempos e artes criativas > Artes e trabalhos manuais > Ferramentas para artes e trabalhos manuais > Utensílios de corte e relevo para trabalhos manuais: Tesouras de escritório e trabalhos manuais; Ferramentas de corte e relevo para trabalhos manuais; Facas para trabalhos manuais; Ferramentas de marcador para trabalhos manuais; Ferramentas de gravação quente; Estiletes e canetas de gravação; Descosedores; Cortadores de linhas e fios
zh-CN: 艺术与娱乐 > 爱好/艺术创作 > 手工艺品 > 手工艺工具 > 手工艺切割/雕刻工具: 手工艺/办公剪刀; 手工艺切割器/压花机; 工艺刀; 工艺刻痕工具; 热雕工具; 浮雕笔/划针; 拆线刀/器; 吊坠断线器/切线器
fi: Taide ja viihde > Harrastukset ja taiteet > Taide ja askartelu > Taide- ja askarteluvälineet > Askarteluleikkurit ja kohokuviointivälineet: Askartelu- ja toimistosakset; Leikkuu- ja kohokuviointilaitteet; Askarteluveitset; Askartelun taittelutyökalut; Kuumailmapuhaltimet kohokuviointiin; Kohokuviointikynät ja -kaivertimet; Ratkoja; Naru- ja lankaleikkurit
it: Arte e svago > Hobby e arti creative > Artigianato e hobby > Strumenti per hobby e artigianato > Strumenti per taglio e goffratura: Forbici da ufficio e per attività creative; Goffratrice e taglierini per attività creative; Taglierini; Piegatrici e marcatori per carta; Strumenti per goffratura a caldo; Penne e strumenti per goffratura; Tagliapunti; Forbici taglia fili e taglia lana
vi: Nghệ thuật và giải trí > Sở thích và nghệ thuật sáng tạo > Đồ thủ công mỹ nghệ > Dụng cụ thủ công mỹ nghệ > Dụng cụ cắt & khắc thủ công: Kéo văn phòng; Máy cắt & điêu khắc thủ công; Dao thủ công; Dụng cụ chạm khắc mỹ nghệ; Máy làm nóng chảy bột nổi; Bút in nổi và bút chạm khắc họa tiết mẫu; Dụng cụ gỡ mũi khâu; Dao cắt chỉ
cs: Umění a zábava > Hobby, hudba a výtvarné umění > Řemesla a koníčky > Hobby pomůcky > Řezací a embosovací hobby pomůcky: Kancelářské a hobby nůžky; Raznice a reliéfní razítka; Hobby nože; Ohýbačky a rýhovače papíru; Nástroje na embosování za tepla; Pera na embossing; Páradla švů; Řezačky nití a příze
sk-SK: Umenie a zábava > Záľuby a tvorivé dielne > Výtvarná dielňa > Nástroje pre výtvarnú dielňu > Rezné a embosovacie nástroje: Kancelárske nožnice; Rezačky a embosovacie zariadenia; Remeselnícke nože; Kreatívne rezacie nástroje; Teplovzdušné embosovacie nástroje; Embosovacie perá a hroty; Odstraňovače švov; Nožnice na nite a priadzu
ko: 아트/엔터테인먼트 > 취미/예술 > 미술/공예 > 미술/공예 도구 > 공예 절단/양각 도구: 공예/사무용 가위; 공예 절단기/양각기; 공예용 칼; 공예용 스코어링 도구; 엠보싱 열풍기; 엠보싱 펜/스타일러스; 실뜯개; 실 커터
el: Τέχνες & Ψυχαγωγία > Χόμπι & Δημιουργικές Τέχνες > Τέχνες & Χειροτεχνίες > Εργαλεία τέχνης & χειροτεχνίας > Κοπτικά & διατρητικά εργαλεία χειροτεχνίας: Ψαλίδια χειροτεχνίας & γραφείου; Κόπτης & κοπτικό και διατρητικό εργαλείο για χειροτεχνίες; Μαχαίρια χειροτεχνίας; Εργαλεία χαρακτικής χειροτεχνίας; Εργαλεία χάραξης με θερμότητα; Στυλό & γραφίδες χάραξης; Κόφτες ραφής; Κόφτες κλωστής και νήματος
hu: Művészet és szórakoztatás > Hobbik és kreatív művészet > Művészet és barkácsolás > Művészeti és kézműves eszközök > Kézműves vágó- és dombornyomó eszközök: Kézműves és irodai ollók; Kézműves vágók és dombornyomók; Kézműves kések; Kézműves hajtogatóeszközök; Dombornyomó hőeszközök; Dombornyomó tollak és ceruzák; Varrathasítók; Cérna- és fonalvágók
pl: Sztuka i rozrywka > Hobby i sztuki piękne > Sztuka i rękodzieło > Narzędzia dla artystów i rękodzielników > Narzędzia do wycinania i wytłaczania: Nożyczki dla hobbystów i do biura; Urządzenia do wycinania i wytłaczania; Skalpele modelarskie; Noże do zaginania i nacinania papieru; Narzędzia do wytłaczania na gorąco; Pisaki i rysiki do wytłaczania; Nożyki do szwów; Obcinacze do nici i przędzy
de: Kunst & Unterhaltung > Hobby & Kunst > Kunsthandwerk & Hobby > Kunst- & Bastelwerkzeuge > Stanz- & Prägewerkzeuge für Kunstarbeiten: Bastel- & Büroscheren; Stanzer & Präger für Kunstarbeiten; Bastelmesser; Rill- & Perforiergeräte für Papier; Heißluftgeräte; Prägestifte & -werkzeug; Nahttrenner; Fadenabschneider & -scheren
es: Arte y ocio > Hobbies y artes creativas > Manualidades > Herramientas para manualidades > Herramientas de gofrado y recorte: Tijeras de oficina y para manualidades; Cortadores y estampadores para manualidades; Cúteres; Hendidoras y plegadoras de papel; Herramientas de calor para gofrado; Bolígrafos y stylus para gofrado; Cortador de costuras; Cortadores de hilo
th: ศิลปะและความบันเทิง > งานอดิเรกและศิลปะสร้างสรรค์ > ศิลปะและงานฝีมือ > เครื่องมือทำงานศิลปะและงานฝีมือ > เครื่องมือตัดงานฝีมือและเครื่องมือทำลายนูน: กรรไกรสำหรับงานฝีมือและสำนักงาน; ที่ตัดและที่ทำลายนูนของงานฝีมือ; มีดสำหรับงานฝีมือ; เครื่องมือสร้างรอยสำหรับงานฝีมือ; เครื่องมือให้ความร้อนในการทำลายนูน; ปากกาและสไตลัสสร้างลายนูน; ที่เลาะด้าย; ที่ตัดเส้นด้ายและไหมพรม
hr-HR: Umjetnost i zabava > Hobiji i kreativne umjetnosti > Umjetnost i rukotvorine > Alati za umjetnost i rukotvorine > Alati za rezanje i graviranje: Škare za rukotvorine i uredske škare; Alati za rezanje i graviranje za rukotvorine; Noževi za rukotvorine; Alati za zarezivanje za rukotvorine; Toplinski alati za graviranje; Olovke i štapići za graviranje; Paralice; Rezači konca i pređe
bg-BG: Изкуства и развлечения > Хобита и творчески изкуства > Изкуства и творчество > Творчески инструменти > Инструменти за изрязване и щамповане: Творчески и офис ножици; Занаятчийски фрези и релефни машини; Творчески ножове; Инструменти за сгъване на хартия; Пистолет за топъл ембосинг; Химикалки и писци за ембосинг; Инструменти за порене на шев; Резци за конци и прежди
en: Arts & Entertainment > Hobbies & Creative Arts > Arts & Crafts > Art & Crafting Tools > Craft Cutting & Embossing Tools: Craft & Office Scissors; Craft Cutters & Embossers; Craft Knives; Craft Scoring Tools; Embossing Heat Tools; Embossing Pens & Styluses; Seam Rippers; Thread & Yarn Cutters
ja: 芸術・エンターテイメント > 趣味・コレクション > クラフト・アート > アート・クラフト用具 > クラフトカット・エンボス加工用具: クラフト用はさみ・オフィス用はさみ; クラフトカッター・エンボス加工用具; デザインナイフ; 筋押し機; エンボスヒーター; エンボスペン・エンボススタイラスペン; シームリッパー; 糸切りばさみ
zh-TW: 藝術/娛樂 > 嗜好和創作藝術 > 藝術品和手工藝品 > 美術/手工藝工具 > 手工藝雕刻/壓花工具: 手工藝剪刀/事務用剪刀; 雕刻機/壓花機; 美工刀; 摺線工具; 熱風槍; 燙凸筆; 拆線刀; 剪線刀
tr: Sanat ve Eğlence > Hobiler ve Sanatsal Çalışmalar > Sanatlar ve El İşleri > Sanat ve El İşi Araçları > El İşi Kesme ve Kabartma Araçları: El İşi ve Ofis Makasları; El İşi Kesiciler ve Kabartıcılar; Maket Bıçakları; El İşi Çentme Makineleri; Kabartma Isı Aletleri; Kabartma Kalemleri ve Stylus Kalemler; Dikiş Sökme Aletleri; İplik ve Yün İpliği Kesme Aletleri
sl-SI: Kultura in zabava > Hobiji in ustvarjalne umetnosti > Umetnost in ročna dela > Orodje za umetniško ustvarjanje in ročna dela > Orodja za rezanje in vtiskovanje: Škarje za ročna dela in univerzalne škarje; Pripomočki za rezanje in vtiskovanje; Noži za ročna dela; Orodja za rezbarjenje; Grelniki za vtiskovanje; Pisala in peresa za vtiskovanje; Orodja za paranje; Rezalniki niti in preje
pt-BR: Artes e entretenimento > Hobbies e artes > Arte e artesanato > Ferramentas para arte e artesanato > Ferramentas para corte e gravação em relevo para artesanato: Tesouras para artesanato e escritório; Cortadores e impressoras de relevo para artesanato; Canivetes; Ferramentas de vinco para artesanato; Aparelhos para pirogravura; Canetas para gravação em alto relevo; Abridores de casas; Discos cortadores de fios
ro-RO: Artă și divertisment > Hobby-uri și artă > Artizanat > Instrumente folosite pentru artă/artizanat > Instrumente pentru tăiere și gofrare pentru proiecte de artizanat: Foarfeci pentru birou și proiecte de artizanat; Cuttere și instrumente pentru matrițare pentru proiecte de artizanat; Cuțite pentru proiecte de artizanat; Unelte de crestat pentru proiecte de artizanat; Instrumente pentru gofrare termică; Vârfuri și stylusuri pentru gofrare; Dispozitiv pentru desfăcut cusături; Dispozitive de tăiat fire și ațe